test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-bleeqd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - blēʼḑ: # Noun 134 'eng /est kelm/fin' - full paradigm
     blēʼḑ+N+Sg+Nom: [blēʼḑ, blēḑ]
     blēʼḑ+N+Sg+Gen: [blēʼḑ, blēḑ]
     blēʼḑ+N+Sg+Par: [blēʼḑõ, blēḑõ]
     blēʼḑ+N+Sg+Dat: [blēʼḑõn, blēḑõn]
     blēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ins: [blēʼḑõks, blēḑõks]
     blēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ill: [blēʼḑõ, blēḑõ]
     blēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ela: [blēʼḑštõ, blēḑštõ]
     blēʼḑ+N+Pl+Nom: [blēʼḑõd, blēḑõd]
     blēʼḑ+N+Pl+Gen: [blēʼḑõd, blēḑõd]
     blēʼḑ+N+Pl+Par: [blēʼḑidi, blēḑidi]
     blēʼḑ+N+Pl+Dat: [blēʼḑõdõn, blēḑõdõn]
     blēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ins: [blēʼḑõdõks, blēḑõdõks]
     blēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ill: [blēʼḑiž, blēḑiž]
     blēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ela: [blēʼḑist, blēḑist]
